Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Reay Lane improvements The sum of $3,730,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to Graham county to improve Reay Lane between U.S. Route 70 and Safford Bryce Road.